Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.475

Laboratory tests—Admission as evidence.

Tests performed by an official laboratory or an officially designated laboratory of a milk sample drawn by a department official or a licensed dairy technician shall be admitted as prima facie evidence of a violation in any proceeding to enforce this chapter.

[ 1999 c 291 s 21.]